de: Paket-Format: Box/Organizer-Box; Komplettpaket (Ausrüstung + Zutaten); Ausrüstungs-Starterpaket (ohne Zutaten); Hartschalenkoffer; Zutaten-Nachfüllpaket; Ohne Koffer/lose Artikel; Rezeptpaket (Zutaten + Anleitung; Weiche Tasche; Röhre/Kanister; Mindestausstattung); Sonstige
pt-BR: Formato do kit: Caixa/caixa organizadora; Kit completo (equipamento e ingredientes); Kit inicial de equipamento (sem ingredientes); Estojo rígido; Kit de refil de ingredientes; Sem estojo/itens soltos; Kit de receita (ingredientes e instruções; Bolsa macia; Tubo/recipiente; equipamento mínimo); Outro
ja: Kit形式: ボックス/オーガナイザーボックス; 完全キット (機材 + 材料); 機材スターターキット (材料なし); ハードケース; 材料補充キット; ケースなし/バラ; レシピキット (材料 + 手順書; ソフトポーチ; チューブ/キャニスター; 最小限の機材); その他
fi: Pakkauksen muoto: Laatikko/lokerikko; Täydellinen pakkaus (välineet ja ainesosat); Laitteiden aloituspakkaus (ei ainesosia); Kova laukku; Ainesosien täydennyspakkaus; Ei laukkua / irrallisia osia; Reseptipakkaus (ainesosat ja ohjeet; Pehmeä pussi; Putki/kanisteri; vähimmäisvälineet); Muu
hr-HR: Format kompleta: Kutija / kutija s pregradama; Cjeloviti komplet (oprema + sastojci); Početnički komplet opreme (bez sastojaka); Tvrda kutija; Komplet za nadopunu sastojaka; Bez kutije / pojedinačne stavke; Komplet s receptom (sastojci + upute; Mekana vrećica; Tuba/Kanistar; minimalna oprema); Ostalo
pt-PT: Formato do kit: Caixa/caixa organizadora; Kit completo (equipamento e ingredientes); Kit de iniciação de equipamento (sem ingredientes); Mala rígida; Kit de recarga de ingredientes; Sem mala/itens soltos; Kit de receita (ingredientes e instruções; Bolsa macia; Tubo/recipiente; equipamento mínimo); Outro
es: Formato del kit: Caja/caja organizadora; Kit completo (equipo e ingredientes); Kit de inicio de equipo (sin ingredientes); Estuche rígido; Kit de recarga de ingredientes; Sin estuche/artículos sueltos; Kit de recetas (ingredientes e instrucciones; Funda blanda; Tubo/recipiente; equipo mínimo); Otro
hu: Készlet formátuma: Doboz / Rendszerező doboz; Teljes készlet (eszközök és összetevők); Kezdő eszközkészlet (összetevők nélkül); Kemény tok; Összetevő utántöltő készlet; Nincs tok / ömlesztett tételek; Receptkészlet (összetevők és útmutató; Puha tasak; Tubus / Doboz; minimális eszköz); Egyéb
fr: Format du kit: Boîte/boîte de rangement; Kit complet (équipement et ingrédients); Kit de démarrage d’équipement (sans ingrédients); Étui rigide; Kit de recharge d’ingrédients; Sans étui/articles en vrac; Kit de recette (ingrédients et instructions; Pochette souple; Tube/boîte; équipement minimal); Autre
sv: Satsens format: Låda/förvaringslåda; Komplett kit (utrustning + ingredienser); Utrustningskit för nybörjare (inga ingredienser); Hårt fodral; Refillkit för ingredienser; Inget fodral / lösa artiklar; Receptkit (ingredienser + instruktioner; Mjuk påse; Rör/behållare; minimal utrustning); Övrigt
en: Kit format: Box/Organizer box; Complete kit (equipment + ingredients); Equipment starter kit (no ingredients); Hard case; Ingredient refill kit; No case/loose items; Recipe kit (ingredients + instructions; Soft pouch; Tube/Canister; minimal equipment); Other
zh-CN: 套装形式: 收纳盒/整理盒; 完整套件（设备 + 原料）; 设备入门套件（无原料）; 硬壳保护套; 原料补充套件; 无外壳/零散物品; 配方套件（原料 + 说明书; 软袋; 管/罐; 最少设备）; 其他
ro-RO: Formatul kitului: Cutie/Cutie organizatoare; Kit complet (echipament + ingrediente); Kit de pornire echipament (fără ingrediente); Cutie rigidă; Kit de rezervă ingrediente; Fără cutie/articole libere; Kit rețetă (ingrediente + instrucțiuni; Husă moale; Tub/Canistră; echipament minim); Altele
sl-SI: Format kompleta: Škatla/organizator; Popoln komplet (oprema + sestavine); Začetni komplet opreme (brez sestavin); Trdi etui; Komplet za ponovno polnjenje sestavin; Brez etuija/posamezni kosi; Komplet za recept (sestavine + navodila; Mehka torbica; Tuba/posoda; minimalna oprema); Drugo
ko: 키트 형식: 상자/정리함; 전체 키트(장비 및 재료); 장비 스타터 키트(재료 없음); 하드 케이스; 재료 리필 키트; 케이스 없음/개별 품목; 레시피 키트(재료 및 설명서; 소프트 파우치; 튜브/캐니스터; 최소 장비); 기타
el: Συσκευασία κιτ: Κουτί/Κουτί οργάνωσης; Πλήρες κιτ (εξοπλισμός + συστατικά); Αρχικό κιτ εξοπλισμού (χωρίς συστατικά); Σκληρή θήκη; Κιτ αναπλήρωσης συστατικών; Χωρίς θήκη/μεμονωμένα αντικείμενα; Κιτ συνταγής (συστατικά + οδηγίες; Μαλακή θήκη; Σωλήνας/Κουτί; βασικός εξοπλισμός); Άλλο
nb: Settets format: Eske/sorteringseske; Komplett sett (utstyr + ingredienser); Startsett med utstyr (ingen ingredienser); Hardt etui; Påfyllingssett for ingredienser; Ingen eske / løse gjenstander; Oppskriftssett (ingredienser + instruksjoner; Myk pose; Rør/beholder; minimalt med utstyr); Annet
bg-BG: Формат на комплекта: Кутия/кутия органайзер; Пълен комплект (оборудване + съставки); Стартов комплект оборудване (без съставки); Твърд калъф; Комплект за допълване със съставки; Без калъф/свободни артикули; Комплект за рецепта (съставки + инструкции; Мек калъф; Туба/контейнер; минимално оборудване); Друго
tr: Kit formatı: Kutu/Düzenleyici kutu; Tam kit (ekipman ve malzemeler); Ekipman başlangıç kiti (malzeme yok); Sert kılıf; Malzeme yenileme kiti; Kılıfsız/gevşek parçalar; Tarif kiti (malzemeler ve talimatlar; Yumuşak kese; Tüp/Kutu; minimum ekipman); Diğer
sk-SK: Formát súpravy: Škatuľa/organizér; Kompletná súprava (vybavenie + prísady); Štartovacia súprava vybavenia (bez prísad); Tvrdé puzdro; Súprava na doplnenie prísad; Bez puzdra/voľné položky; Súprava s receptom (prísady + pokyny; Mäkké puzdro; Tuba/nádoba; minimálne vybavenie); Iné
vi: Định dạng bộ dụng cụ: Hộp/Hộp sắp xếp; Trọn bộ (dụng cụ + nguyên liệu); Bộ dụng cụ khởi đầu (không gồm nguyên liệu); Hộp cứng; Bộ châm thêm nguyên liệu; Không có hộp/đồ rời; Bộ công thức nấu ăn (nguyên liệu + hướng dẫn; Túi mềm; Ống/Hộp; ít dụng cụ); Khác
cs: Formát sady: Krabice / organizér; Kompletní sada (vybavení + suroviny); Startovací sada vybavení (bez surovin); Pevné pouzdro; Doplňovací sada surovin; Bez pouzdra / volné položky; Sada na recept (suroviny + návod; Měkké pouzdro; Tuba/nádoba; minimální vybavení); Jiné
zh-TW: 套件形式: 盒子/收納盒; 完整套組 (設備 + 備料); 設備入門套組 (無備料); 硬殼; 備料補充套組; 無外盒/散裝品; 食譜套組 (備料 + 說明書; 軟袋; 軟管/罐裝; 極簡設備); 其他
da: Sætformat: Æske/sorteringsæske; Komplet sæt (udstyr + ingredienser); Startudstyrssæt (ingen ingredienser); Hårdt etui; Sæt med genopfyldning af ingredienser; Intet etui / løse varer; Opskriftssæt (ingredienser + instruktioner; Blød pose; Rør/dåse; minimalt udstyr); Andet
nl: Kit formaat: Doos/opbergdoos; Complete kit (apparatuur + ingrediënten); Starterkit apparatuur (geen ingrediënten); Harde koffer; Navulkit ingrediënten; Geen koffer/losse artikelen; Receptenkit (ingrediënten + instructies; Zacht etui; Buis/koker; minimale apparatuur); Anders
it: Formato del kit: Scatola/scatola organizer; Kit completo (attrezzatura e ingredienti); Kit iniziale attrezzatura (senza ingredienti); Custodia rigida; Kit di ricarica ingredienti; Senza custodia/articoli sfusi; Kit ricetta (ingredienti e istruzioni; Custodia morbida; Tubo/barattolo; attrezzatura minima); Altro
lt-LT: Rinkinio formatas: Dėžutė / dėžutė su skyreliais; Pilnas rinkinys (įranga ir ingredientai); Pradedančiojo įrangos rinkinys (be ingredientų); Kietas dėklas; Ingredientų papildymo rinkinys; Be dėklo / palaidi daiktai; Recepto rinkinys (ingredientai ir instrukcijos; Minkštas maišelis; Tūba / skardinė; minimali įranga); Kita
pl: Format zestawu: Pudełko / organizer; Kompletny zestaw (sprzęt + składniki); Zestaw startowy sprzętu (bez składników); Twardy futerał; Zestaw uzupełniający składników; Bez etui / luźne elementy; Zestaw z przepisem (składniki + instrukcje; Miękkie etui; Tuba / pojemnik; podstawowy sprzęt); Inny
ru: Формат набора: Коробка/органайзер; Полный набор (оборудование + ингредиенты); Стартовый набор оборудования (без ингредиентов); Жесткий футляр; Набор ингредиентов для пополнения; Без футляра/поштучно; Набор по рецепту (ингредиенты + инструкции; Мягкий чехол; Туба/банка; минимальное оборудование); Другое
th: รูปแบบชุดอุปกรณ์: กล่อง/กล่องจัดระเบียบ; ชุดครบเซ็ต (อุปกรณ์ + ส่วนผสม); ชุดอุปกรณ์เริ่มต้น (ไม่มีส่วนผสม); ฮาร์ดเคส; ชุดเติมส่วนผสม; ไม่มีกล่องใส่/สินค้าแยกชิ้น; ชุดตามสูตร (ส่วนผสม + วิธีทำ; ซองแบบนิ่ม; หลอด/กระป๋อง; อุปกรณ์แบบมินิมอล); อื่นๆ